District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-804

Reincorporation; extension of time of corporate existence; vote required for approval of name change.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1284, ch. 854, § 602
Mar. 3, 1905, 33 Stat. 1012, ch. 1445
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(7), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-804.
1981 Ed., § 29-1004.
1973 Ed., § 29-604.